Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1049.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1162(a) and 1163(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:§ 1162. Transfer to vehicle salvage dealer.(a) General rule.--[Any] Except as provided under subsection (d), any owner who transfers a vehicle or a salvage vehicle to a vehicle salvage dealer, as defined in section 1337(c)(2) (relating to use of "Miscellaneous Motor Vehicle Business" registration plates), shall assign the certificate of title or salvage certificate to the vehicle salvage dealer. A certificate of title or salvage certificate for a vehicle transferred to a vehicle salvage dealer is exempt from the requirements of notarization and verification by a corporate officer.12345678910111213141516171819 * * *(d) Title not required.--A vehicle salvage dealer may purchase from an insurer a vehicle on which a total loss payment has been made by an insurer without obtaining a certificate of title or salvage certificate for the vehicle if all of the following apply:(1) The vehicle is purchased from an insurer by a vehicle salvage dealer solely for the purposes of recycling parts, dismantling or scrap.(2) Within five business days of the transfer of the vehicle from an insurer to a vehicle salvage dealer, the vehicle salvage dealer submits to the department a form provided by the department on the department's publicly accessible Internet website that contains the following:(i) The vehicle information, including year, make, model and vehicle identification number.(ii) Insurer information.(iii) Vehicle salvage dealer information.(iv) Anticipated method and date of final disposition of the dismantled vehicle.(v) An attestation by an authorized representative of the vehicle salvage dealer that the vehicle is being purchased solely for the purposes of recycling parts, dismantling or scrap.(vi) A certificate of title or salvage certificate, if available, or a bill of sale that memorializes the transfer of the vehicle between the insurer and the vehicle salvage dealer. § 1163. Transfer to scrap metal processor.(a) Flattened vehicles.--[When] Except as provided under 20250SB1049PN1236 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (e), when a vehicle has been flattened, crushed or processed to the extent that it is no longer identifiable as a vehicle, its certificate of title, certificate of salvage or nonrepairable certificate shall be attached to a form prescribed by the department and immediately sent to the department. The form shall include such information as the department shall require. A copy of the form shall be retained for record in accordance with section 6308(d) (relating to investigation by police officers). The vehicle scrap material shall no longer be considered a vehicle and shall not be reconstructed, retitled or issued a certificate of any kind.* * * (e) Title not required.--A scrap metal processor may purchase from an insurer a vehicle on which a total loss payment has been made by an insurer without obtaining a certificate of title or salvage certificate for the vehicle if all of the following apply:(1) The vehicle is purchased from an insurer by a scrap metal processor solely for the purposes of recycling parts, dismantling or scrap.(2) Within five business days of the transfer of the vehicle from an insurer to a scrap metal processor, the scrap metal processor submits to the department a form provided by the department on the department's publicly accessible Internet website that contains the following: (i) The vehicle information, including year, make, model and vehicle identification number.(ii) Insurer information.(iii) Scrap metal processor information.(iv) Anticipated method and date of final 20250SB1049PN1236 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disposition of the dismantled vehicle.(v) An attestation by an authorized representative of the scrap metal processor that the vehicle is being purchased solely for the purposes of recycling parts, dismantling or scrap.(vi) A certificate of title or certificate of salvage, if available, or a bill of sale that memorializes the transfer of the vehicle between the insurer and the scrap metal processor.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1049PN1236 - 4 - 12345678910